California statutes. Education Code
To the extent permitted by federal law, a school district may contract with nonprofit organizations and agencies experienced in administering parent involvement programs to design or implement, or design and implement, a school’s parent involvement program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1400, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11506.

Schools that receive federal funds under Chapter 1 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, as amended by the Augustus F. Hawkins-Robert T. Stafford Elementary and Secondary School Improvement Amendments of 1988 (P. L. 100-297), and receive funds for school improvement plans pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 52000) of Part 28 or economic impact aid pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 54020) of Chapter 1 of Part 29, may receive funds for school improvement plans pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 52000) of Part 28 or economic impact aid pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 54020) of Chapter 1 of Part 29 only if they comply with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1400, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Center for International Education Synergy [11700. - 11700.]

11700.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Center for International Education Synergy be established through a joint powers agreement, entered into pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, between the Sweetwater Union High School District, the Southwestern Community College District, and San Diego State University. It is the intent of the Legislature that a joint powers agency created pursuant to the joint powers agreement own and maintain the land and facilities for the Center for International Education Synergy at the Otay Mesa Off-Campus Center.

(b) In addition to funding appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of the Center for International Education Synergy, entities participating in the establishment and operation of the center are encouraged to seek supplemental funding, including, but not limited to, funding from foundations, corporations, and other public entities.

(c) Any postsecondary education facilities and programs developed pursuant to this section shall be subject to the requirements of Section 66903 as they apply to the governing boards of public postsecondary educational institutes.

(d) The Center for International Education Synergy shall be established only upon approval by the California Postsecondary Education Commission based on a needs study and subsequent approval from the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. K–12 High-Speed Internet Connectivity for the Public School System [11800. - 11800.]

11800.

(a) (1) The K–12 High-Speed Network (K–12 HSN) is hereby established for purposes of enriching pupil educational experiences and improving pupil academic performance by providing high-speed, high-bandwidth internet connectivity to the public school system, as defined by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution.

(2) The California Education Network is hereby established, consisting of the California Research and Education Network (CalREN) and the K–12 HSN.

(b) The Superintendent shall collect the information necessary to measure the success of the K–12 HSN and ensure that the benefits of the K–12 HSN are maximized to the extent possible. The K–12 HSN shall provide
 critical services and functions for public primary and secondary local educational agencies, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Reliable and cost-effective internet service that, among other things, is sufficient to support bandwidth-intensive applications, digital learning, and related independent study capabilities.

(2) Reliable and secure interconnectivity among public school entities offering kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, in California, connection to higher education institutions of California, and connection to state and local agencies to facilitate efficient interaction, including transmission of data.

(3) Statewide coordination of network uses to benefit teaching and learning.

(c) The Superintendent shall use a competitive grant process to select a local educational agency to serve as the lead education agency to administer the K–12 HSN on behalf of the Superintendent.

(d) The Superintendent shall establish a K–12 HSN advisory board to be composed of all of the following members:

(1) The Superintendent or the Superintendent’s designee.

(2) The county superintendent of schools of the lead education agency or their
 designee.

(3) A county superintendent of schools of a county with an average daily attendance of more than 60,000 pupils, appointed by the Superintendent. The member appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall serve a renewable two-year term.

(4) Three school district superintendents, appointed by the Superintendent. Members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall represent school districts that are diverse as to geography and size, and that serve socioeconomically and culturally diverse pupil populations. Members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall serve renewable two-year terms.

(5) Two county superintendents of schools appointed by the majority of the votes of all of the county superintendents of schools. Members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall serve renewable two-year
 terms.

(6) Three schoolsite representatives, who shall include not less than two classroom teachers or instructional specialists. Members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall serve renewable two-year terms.

(7) The president of the state board or the president’s designee.

(e) The advisory board shall meet quarterly and shall recommend policy direction and broad operational guidance to the Superintendent and the lead education agency. The advisory board, in consultation with the lead education agency, shall develop recommendations for measuring the success of the network, improving network oversight and monitoring, strengthening accountability, and optimizing the use of the K–12 HSN and its ability to improve education. The advisory board shall
 submit, on or before March 1 of each year, an annual report with program highlights to the department and the Department of Finance.

(f) The duties of the lead education agency shall include all of the following:

(1) (A) Before expending any funds for planned network upgrade projects that exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in cost, development of a methodology to determine and prioritize planned network upgrade projects, including the size and scope of any planned network upgrade project, which takes into consideration at least all of the following:

(i) Peak network usage to circuit capacity ratios.

(ii) Five
 years of trends in network
 traffic.

(iii) Eligibility for subsidies provided through the federal E-Rate program.

(iv) Competitive bidding
 results within a level of capacity upgrade and across all feasible levels of capacity upgrades.

(v) Actual expected usage projections and other input, as determined through formal communication with network site administrators.

(vi) Specific network performance measures, including the frequency, cause, location, and duration of network outages or interruptions.

(vii) Useful life of proposed equipment upgrades.

(B) The lead education agency shall
 use its methodology for all planned network upgrade projects that exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in cost.

(2) Entering into appropriate contracts for the provision of high-speed, high-bandwidth internet connectivity, provided the contracts secure the necessary terms and conditions to adequately protect the interests of the state. Terms and conditions shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Development of comprehensive service level agreements.

(B) Protection of any ownership rights of intellectual property of the state that result due to participation of the state in the K–12 HSN.

(C) Appropriate protection of assets of the state acquired due to its participation in the K–12 HSN.

(D) Assurance that appropriate fee structures are in place.

(E) Assurance that any interest earned on funds of the state for this purpose are used solely to the benefit of the project.

(3) Development of an annual budget request for the K–12 HSN for submission to the department and the Department of Finance to be considered for the annual Budget Act.

(4) Development, in consultation with the advisory board established pursuant to subdivision (d), of specific goals and objectives for the program with appropriate reporting of success measures developed by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (b).

(5) Ongoing fiscal oversight of the program, including mechanisms to control statewide costs
 and exposure. To accomplish this objective, the lead education agency shall contract for an annual independent audit of the program. The independent auditor shall report the audit findings to the Superintendent, the Legislature, and the Department of Finance by December 15 of each year.

(6) Ongoing technical oversight of the program, including external evaluation and independent validation, where appropriate.

(7) (A) Administering grant programs to promote the most cost-effective manner for the completion of connectivity for all public schools of the state and cost-effective applications that meet instructional needs to the extent that funds are provided for these purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(B) Before the appropriation of any state funds for purposes of this paragraph, the lead education agency shall submit information justifying the need for additional grant funds, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The number of schools and school districts that are already connected.

(ii) The means by which the costs associated with connectivity were covered for schools and school districts that are already connected.

(iii) Obstacles
 to connection for those schools and school districts that are not yet connected.

(iv) Other local options and funding sources for purposes of connectivity and applications.

(g) The Superintendent shall apportion funds appropriated for the program in a given fiscal year in compliance with both of the following:

(1) Three-fourths of the total amount appropriated shall be apportioned by August 31.

(2) Up to one-fourth of the total amount appropriated shall be apportioned by January 31.

(h) The Superintendent may request data and other programmatic information from the lead education agency as needed to oversee the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 7.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 8. PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL PROGRAMS AND INTERSTATE AGREEMENTS [12000. - 12515.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. Administration of Federal Programs—State Board of Education [12000. - 12143.]



  ARTICLE 1. Allocation of Federal Funds and Federal Tax Credit Bond Volume Cap [12000. - 12002.]

12000.

(a) If, by any act of Congress, funds are provided as federal aid to education to the several states and the disposition of the funds is not otherwise provided for by or under the act of Congress or by or under any law of this state, the apportionment and distribution of those funds to school districts shall, insofar as consistent with the requirements prescribed by the federal law and implementing rules and regulations, be governed by the standards set forth in this article.

(b) If a federal law designates a state educational agency or other agency or officer primarily responsible for state supervision of public schools, that designation shall be deemed to refer to the state board.
 The state board shall make timely application for any federal funds made available, and shall, pursuant to the federal law and this article, direct the allocation and apportionment of the federal funds to school districts.

(c) The department and any other state agency that administers a grant or allocation of federal funds to a school district, shall allow an indirect cost rate, as that term is defined in Section 33338, that is not less than the indirect cost rate established by the department for each school district, unless federal law requires a lower indirect cost rate for school districts that receive federal funds.

(d) For purposes of this section and Section 12001, “school districts” include school districts, county offices of education, and other educational agencies or entities deemed eligible pursuant to state and federal law.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 587, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (AB 1064)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

The state board shall adopt rules and regulations for the allocation of federal funds to school districts entitled to receive federal funds for the support of schools. In determining the rules and regulations by which those allocations are to be made, the state board shall consider all factors of local effort and all educational programs maintained by those school districts. The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be based upon need, and the state board shall carefully scrutinize the abilities and efforts of the affected school districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 28.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.5.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds designated for the state by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5), together with Internal Revenue Service Notice 2009-35 issued pursuant thereto, does not constitute federal moneys, federal funds, or funds of any kind for any purpose under this code.

(b) There is hereby assigned to the State Department of Education, seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000) of the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds, to be further assigned and distributed to or for the benefit of school districts
 and county offices of education in the state, as the State Department of Education shall determine.

(c) (1) There is hereby assigned to the California School Finance Authority, established pursuant to Section 17172, seventy-three million five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($73,525,000) of the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds, to be issued for the benefit of charter schools, or to be further assigned and distributed to one or more issuers in the state for the benefit of charter schools, as the authority shall determine.

(2) The parameters specified in “Borrowing Authority Parameters and Application,” dated February 10, 2010, as developed by the
 California School Finance Authority and referenced in Resolution 10-04 of the authority, shall apply to all applications submitted to the California School Finance Authority for the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds. If an applicant uses any 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap in conjunction with a bond that will serve as a local match for purposes of the Charter School Facilities Program established by Section 17078.52, the applicant, in addition to the requirements of this section, shall comply with all of the requirements of the Charter School Facilities Program.

(d) (1) Any of the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds assigned to the State Department of Education pursuant to subdivision (b) that has not resulted in the issuance of qualified school construction bonds by December 31, 2009,
 shall be added to the state’s volume cap for 2010, in accordance with subsection (e) of Section 54F of the Internal Revenue Code, and assigned as set forth in this section. Those districts and county offices of education that received an assignment from the State Department of Education by December 31, 2009, and notification from the State Department of Education that they were granted an extension to issue bonds through March 31, 2010, shall have an additional 120 days from the effective date of this legislation to issue bonds.

(2) Any of the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds originally assigned to the State Department of Education in 2009 pursuant to subdivision (b) that does not result in the issuance of qualified school construction bonds within 120 days from the effective date of
 this legislation shall revert to the state, and shall be reallocated in accordance with the process established pursuant to state law for allocating the 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds.

(3) The department shall reassign to a school district any 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds that was directly allocated to the district by the United States Internal Revenue Service pursuant to Internal Revenue Service Notice 2009-35, did not result in the issuance of qualified school construction bonds by December 31, 2009, and was reallocated by the district to the state no later than 30 days after the effective date of this section. The department shall grant the school district 120 days from the effective date of this section to issue the qualified school construction bonds. Any of the state’s federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction
 bonds assigned to a school district described in this paragraph that does not result in the issuance of qualified school construction bonds within 120 days from the effective date of this section shall revert to the state and shall be reallocated by the department in accordance with the process established pursuant to state law for allocating the 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds.

(e) (1) Any of the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds assigned to the California School Finance Authority pursuant to subdivision (c) that has not resulted in the issuance of qualified school construction bonds by December 31, 2009, shall be added to the state’s volume cap for 2010, in accordance with subsection (e) of Section 54F of the Internal Revenue Code, and allocated as set forth in this section. Any charter school that received an
 allocation from the California School Finance Authority prior to December 31, 2009, shall retain its allocation pursuant to the resolution of the California School Finance Authority.

(2) Any of the state’s 2009 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds originally allocated to the California School Finance Authority in 2009 pursuant to subdivision (c) that does not result in the issuance of qualified school construction bonds by December 31, 2010, shall be retained by the California School Finance Authority, and reallocated in accordance with the qualified school construction bond parameters established by the California School Finance Authority.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in order to further the purposes of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, and allow school districts to issue federal tax credit bonds as expeditiously as possible, the assignment and distribution of the federal tax credit bond volume cap by the State Department of Education and the California School Finance Authority under this section are exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the parameters and conditions adopted by the department and the California School Finance Authority be comparable where practical and applicable in order to ensure
 consistency and equity in the state level assignment and distribution of the federal tax credit bond volume cap, including, but not limited to, maximum tax credit amounts per project or school district.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, issuers within the state may issue qualified school construction bonds in any manner permitted by federal law, including, but not limited to, as tax credit bonds or federal subsidy bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   (SB 205)   Effective March 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.6.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds designated to California by the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (P.L. 111-5), together with Internal Revenue Service Notice 2010-17 issued pursuant thereto, does not constitute federal moneys, federal funds, or funds of any kind for any purpose under this code.

(b) The department is authorized to assign and distribute the state’s 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds to or for the benefit of school districts and county offices of education in the state.

(c) There is
 hereby assigned to the department six hundred fifty-one million six hundred fifty-two thousand dollars ($651,652,000) of the state’s 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds.

(1) A school district or county office of education may apply for the federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds if the project is funded by local voter-approved bonds issued by the school district or bond anticipation notes as authorized by Section 15150. A county office of education and a school district with an enrollment of 2,500 or less may use other forms of financing with the submission of a resolution adopted by the county board of education or governing board of the school district authorizing the issuance of the financing.

(2) A school district or county office of education that received a 2009 allocation but did not make any
 issuance may apply for 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds nine months after the effective date of this section.

(3) A school district or county office of education that received a 2009 or 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bond allocation from the United States Department of the Treasury is not eligible to apply.

(4) Five business days after the enactment Section 2 of Chapter 266 of the Statutes of 2010, the department shall post the application form on its Internet Web site.

(A) An application must be submitted via certified mail.

(B) An application shall not be postmarked until 30 business days after the enactment of Section 2 of Chapter 266 of the Statutes of
 2010.

(C) An application shall include the total number of enrolled pupils who qualify for the federal free and reduced price meal program and the total overall pupil enrollment for the 2008–09 school year.

(5) An application not meeting the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) and (4) shall be returned to the applicant.

(6) Applications meeting the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) and (4) shall be accepted on a first-come-first-served basis by date of postmark. If this program is oversubscribed, order of allocation shall be established using the following criteria:

(A) First, earliest date of postmark.

(B) Second, the project for which the federal qualified school construction
 bond authorization will be applied received approval from the Division of the State Architect before the application was submitted.

(C) Third, the greater percentage of pupils who qualify for the federal free and reduced price meals program and are enrolled in the applying school district or county office of education in the 2008–09 school year. The department shall certify the number of pupils who qualify and the overall enrollment and calculate the percentage to the nearest one-hundredth of 1 percent.

(7) The department shall authorize the 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds no sooner than December 1, 2010.

(8) The department shall maintain a waiting list of eligible school districts and county offices of education that did not receive an allocation in the order
 established pursuant to paragraph (6).

(9) An applicant may not apply for more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds.

(10) A school district or county office of education applying for 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds authorization shall certify in its application that it will fulfill all of the federal qualified school construction bond program requirements, including both of the following requirements:

(A) Within six months of the date of issuance, the school district or county office of education shall enter into a contract or contracts for use of an amount of bond proceeds equal to 10 percent of the authorization.

(B) Within three years of the date of issuance, the school district or county office of education shall spend 100 percent of the bond proceeds for a qualified purpose.

(11) Fifteen days after bond issuance, the school district or county office of education shall submit to the department a copy of the appropriate federal Internal Revenue Service Form, Information Return for Tax-Exempt Bonds, as confirmation of issuance.

(12) Thirty days after the completion of the expenditure the recipient shall submit a completion report to the department. The completion report must be certified by the bond counsel of the school district or county office of education.

(13) If any or all of the federal qualified school construction bond authorizations to a school district or county office of education are not issued
 within six months from the date of authorization, any or all unused federal qualified school construction bond authorizations shall revert to the department. No extensions shall be provided.

(A) The department shall reallocate any remaining federal qualified school construction bond allocation to school districts or county offices of education that were eligible and applied for the authorization but did not receive an allocation.

(B) Reverted 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds shall be allocated to school districts or county offices of education pursuant to the order of priority established by paragraph (6).

(C) The department shall allocate reverted federal qualified school construction bond authorizations as they are available and until all are issued.

(d) The California School Finance Authority, established pursuant to Section 17172, is authorized to assign and distribute the state’s 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds to or for the benefit of charter schools, or to be further assigned and distributed to one or more issuers in the state for the benefit of charter schools, as determined by the authority.

(1) There is hereby assigned to the California School Finance Authority, established pursuant to Section 17172, sixty-eight million four hundred six thousand dollars ($68,406,000) of the state’s 2010 federal tax credit bond volume cap for qualified school construction bonds, to be issued for the benefit of charter schools, or to be further assigned and distributed to one or more issuers in the state for the benefit of charter schools, as the authority shall determine.

(2) A charter school may apply for the federal qualified school construction bond volume cap if it meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The charter school is operated as, or is operated by, a nonprofit entity.

(B) The charter school has an approved charter in place that is current at the time of application and continuously through the date of bond issuance.

(C) The chartering authority certifies that the charter school is in good standing and is in compliance with the terms of its charter.

(D) The charter school provides the level of classroom-based instruction specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 47612.5.

(E) The applicant has completed at least three full school years of instructional operation as a charter school as of the end of the previous school year.

(3) Five business days after the effective date of this section, the California School Finance Authority shall post the application form and fee schedule on its Internet Web site.

(4) An application shall not be postmarked until 30 business days after the effective date of this section.

(5) Following a review of all applications and a preliminary award of borrowing authority, the California School Finance Authority shall ask applicants to provide additional information as necessary for the issuance of the bonds.

(6) Applications that meet the conditions set forth in paragraph (2) shall be
 considered by the California School Finance Authority on a first-come-first-served basis by date of postmark. If the program is oversubscribed, staff shall present a priority list to the authority pursuant to paragraph (7).

(7) If the program is oversubscribed, priority shall be assigned first to those charter schools that are best able to demonstrate to the California School Finance Authority, in its sole discretion, that they will be capable of accessing the capital markets or be privately placed with an investor. The order of allocation shall be established using the following criteria:

(A) Applicants that are able to obtain credit enhancement for a qualified school construction bond financing, including a bank letter of credit, or contribute substantial equity to a project, or are otherwise able to obtain investment-grade credit ratings shall receive priority over other
 applicants.

(B) If multiple applicants satisfy the criteria described in subparagraph (A), priority shall be assigned to applications with the earliest postmark date. An application that is hand delivered and does not have a postmark date will be ranked based on the time the application is received by the California School Finance Authority.

(8) Applicants shall not apply for more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of qualified school construction bond authorization per project.

(9) Subsequent application cycles may be considered if borrowing authority for qualified school construction bonds remains available after the initial application period.

(10) Subject to the sole discretion of the California School Finance Authority, authorization to
 borrow qualified school construction bond proceeds is contingent on the issuance of the qualified school construction bonds by December 31, 2011, after which time the authorization expires and the authority may allocate the authorization to another qualified applicant.

(11) The California School Finance Authority shall allocate reverted federal qualified school construction bond authorization as it becomes available and until all of the authorization is issued.

(12) If an applicant uses any federal tax credit bond volume cap in conjunction with a bond that will serve as a local match for purposes of the Charter School Facilities Program established by Section 17078.52, the applicant, in addition to the requirements of this section, shall comply with all of the requirements of the Charter School Facilities Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 49.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, if a charter school applies for the federal qualified school construction bond volume cap, or any other federal bond borrowing authority, the charter school shall notify, in writing and at least 30 days before submitting the application, the district superintendent of schools and the governing board of the school district in which the charter school is physically located of its intent to rehabilitate, encumber, or otherwise alter school district property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 80, Sec. 1.   (AB 1859)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Auxiliary State School Fund. Any funds received under act of Congress as federal aid to education, and not required by such act or any law of this state to be otherwise deposited, may be deposited in the Auxiliary State School Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Authority [12010. - 12011.]

12010.

Whenever by the provisions of any act of Congress the act is to be administered in the state by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, Director of Education, Department of Education, State Board of Education, or any one or more of such officers, or agencies, the officers and agencies designated in the act of the Congress are authorized to administer the act in the state. Such officers and agencies are vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof in the administration of the act of Congress and rules and regulations lawfully adopted thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12011.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may apply to the United States Office of Education for recognition as an accrediting agency for private vocational schools under his or her jurisdiction for the purposes of receiving federal funds.

(b) If the Superintendent of Public Instruction is recognized by the federal government as an accrediting agency for private vocational schools under his jurisdiction, he or she may impose a fee for services performed in connection with such accreditation in an amount sufficient to cover the costs incurred by him or her in performing that function.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Emergency School Construction and Federal Impact Aid [12020. - 12020.]

12020.

The State Board of Education is designated as the state educational agency to carry out the purposes and provisions of Public Law 815 and Public Law 874 of the 81st Congress, and is vested with all necessary power and authority to perform all acts necessary to receive the benefits and to allocate the funds provided by the acts of Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 97.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 and National Defense Education Act of 1958 [12030. - 12036.]

12030.

The people of the State of California accept the provisions of, and each of the funds provided by, the act of Congress titled “An act to strengthen the national defense and to encourage and assist in the expansion and improvement of educational programs to meet critical national needs; and for other purposes” (National Defense Education Act of 1958), approved September 2, 1958, and the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.), as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114–95).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 5.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12031.

In accepting the benefits of these acts of Congress, the people of the state agree to comply with all of their provisions and to observe all of their requirements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12032.

The state board is designated as the state educational agency to carry out the purposes and the provisions of these acts of Congress. The state board is hereby vested with authority to prepare and submit to the United States Secretary of Education any state plan required by these acts of Congress, to prepare and submit amendments to the state plans, and to administer the state plans or amendments thereto, in accordance with these acts of Congress and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder. The state board is hereby vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with the government of the United States, or any agency or agencies thereof in the administration of these acts of Congress and the rules and
 regulations adopted thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 669, Sec. 6.   (AB 1661)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

12033.

The State Treasurer is designated as the custodian of all funds received by the state from the government of the United States, or of any agency or agencies thereof, under these federal acts and he is authorized to receive and provide for the custody of all moneys so received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12034.

The funds received by the state under the provisions of these federal acts shall be paid out by the State Treasurer on warrants drawn by the Controller and requisitioned by the State Board of Education in carrying out the purposes of these federal acts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12035.

The president or the administrative head of each community college and the State Nautical School may establish and administer student loan funds pursuant to the act of Congress known as the “National Defense Education Act of 1958. ” Money allocated for the purpose of establishing a student loan fund at the State Nautical School may be withdrawn from the State Treasury and deposited to the credit of that institution in a trust account in accordance with the provisions of Government Code Sections 16305 to 16305.7 for the purpose of making loans to students in accordance with the federal act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

12036.

It is in the interests of the state and of the people thereof for the state to provide money for student loan funds in public institutions of higher learning on the basis of an amount equal to not less than one-ninth of federal capital contributions to such student loan funds as provided by the National Defense Education Act of 1958 for needy students at these publicly supported institutions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Vocational Education Acts [12050. - 12060.]

12050.

The people of the state accept the provisions of, and each of the funds provided by, the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (P.L. 98-524), the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act Amendments of 1990 (P.L. 101-392; 20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 and following), and any acts amending or succeeding those acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12052.

In accepting the benefits of the acts of Congress referred to in Section 12050, the people of the state agree to comply with all of the provisions and to observe all of the requirements of those acts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12053.
